Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.911

Prior proceedings validated, ratified, approved and confirmed.

All proceedings which have been taken prior to the date *this 1967 amendatory act takes effect for the purpose of financing or aiding in the financing of any work, undertaking or project by any metropolitan municipal corporation, including all proceedings for the authorization and issuance of bonds and for the sale, execution, and delivery thereof, are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power (other than constitutional) of such metropolitan municipal corporation or the governing body or officers thereof, to authorize and issue such bonds, or to sell, execute, or deliver the same and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities (other than constitutional) in such proceedings.

[ 1967 c 105 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The effective date of "this 1967 amendatory act" [1967 c 105] is March 21, 1967; see preface to 1967 session laws. For codification of 1967 c 105, see Codification Tables.